Hawaii statutes.
[§431:19-101.7] General powers and duties.
The administrator shall:

(1) Have the authority expressly conferred upon the
administrator by, or reasonably implied from, the provisions of this article;
and

(2) Assist the commissioner in the enforcement of
this article and rules adopted pursuant to this article and related to captive
insurance. [L 1997, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next